Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-142
Appeal; procedure; attorney's fees; failure to appeal; effect.

(1) Any party to a proceeding before the commission aggrieved by any decision and order of the commission and directly affected thereby may appeal the decision and order, and the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

(2) In any action or proceeding under sections 20-132 to 20-143, wherein an appeal is lodged in the district court, the court in its discretion may allow the prevailing party reasonable attorney's fees as part of the costs.

(3) If no proceeding to obtain judicial review is instituted by a respondent within thirty days from the service of an order of the commission, the commission may obtain a decree of the court for the enforcement of such order upon showing that the respondent is subject to the commission's jurisdiction and resides or transacts business within the county in which the petition for enforcement is brought.

Laws 1973, LB 112, § 11;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 20.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.

For provisions of Equal Opportunity Commission, see sections 48-1116 and 48-1117.